Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-269
County agricultural society; reinstatement; effect.

The reinstatement of a county agricultural society shall validate all contracts, acts, matters, and things made, done, and performed within the scope of its articles of incorporation, its officers, and its agents during the time when the corporate existence was inoperative with the same force and effect and to all intents and purposes as if the corporate existence had at all times remained in full force and effect. All real and personal property, rights, and credits which were of the county agricultural society at the time its corporate existence became inoperative and which were not disposed of prior to the time of the revival or renewal shall be vested in the society, after the revival and renewal, as fully and completely as they were held by the society at and before the time its corporate existence became inoperative. The corporation, after such renewal and revival, shall be as exclusively liable for all contracts, acts, matters, and things made, done, or performed in its name and on its behalf by its officers and agents prior to the reinstatement as if its corporate existence had at all times remained in full force and effect.

Laws 1995, LB 671, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 2-243;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 20.